Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 11
VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTER PENSION ACT

Editor's note:

Section 23 of the act enacting this part 11 (chapter 254, Session Laws of Colorado 1995) provides the following:

This act shall not affect the terms of members of the boards of trustees created to administer volunteer firemen's pension funds under part 4 of article 30 of title 31, Colorado Revised Statutes, as in effect before June 5, 1995, in any municipality, fire protection district, or county improvement district in this state that maintains a regularly organized volunteer fire department. On and after June 5, 1995, these board members shall continue their terms and duties on the applicable boards of trustees of the volunteer firefighter pension funds under part 11 of article 30 of title 31, Colorado Revised Statutes, created in this act.

This act shall not terminate or require transfers of moneys from volunteer firemen's pension funds governed by part 4 of article 30 of title 31, Colorado Revised Statutes, in effect before June 5, 1995. On and after June 5, 1995, these funds shall remain in effect and be governed by part 11 of article 30 of title 31, Colorado Revised Statutes, created in this act.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1995 act enacting this part 11, see section 1 of chapter 254, Session Laws of Colorado 1995.

31-30-1101. Short title.

This part 11 shall be known and may be cited as the "Volunteer Firefighter Pension Act".

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1364, § 2, effective June 5.

31-30-1102. Definitions.

As used in this part 11, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Board" means the board of trustees of the volunteer firefighter pension fund that is created in a municipality or district under this part 11.

"District" means a fire protection district or county improvement district in this state having fire department members and offering fire protection services, and any county that provides funding, including volunteer pension funding, through intergovernmental cooperation for the provision of fire protection services.

"Fire and police pension association" means the association created by section 31-31-201.

"Fire department member" means a volunteer firefighter who is in a fire department that serves a municipality, county, or district and who accrues benefits in the volunteer firefighter pension fund.

"Fund" means the volunteer firefighter pension fund provided in this part 11.

"Municipality" means a municipality in this state that maintains a regularly organized volunteer fire department and that offers fire protection services.

"Plan" means a program of benefits provided under this part 11.

(7.5) "Previous net valuation" means an amount equal to the total valuation for assessment certified by the county assessor pursuant to section 39-5-128, C.R.S., and amended pursuant to section 39-1-111 (5), C.R.S., less the valuation for assessment that has been divided for an urban renewal area pursuant to section 31-25-107 (9) or for a downtown development authority pursuant to section 31-25-807 (3) for the property tax year in which the municipality or district made a contribution to the fund. If the total valuation for assessment certified by the county assessor, as amended, does not include the valuation for assessment that has been divided for an urban renewal area, such urban renewal valuation for assessment shall not be subtracted from the total valuation for assessment.

"Retired fire department member" means a volunteer firefighter who is not on active duty and who receives pension benefits from the volunteer firefighter pension fund.

"Volunteer firefighter" means a firefighter who renders service to a fire department in a municipality, county, or district, who does not receive compensation as a firefighter, and who is not classified as an employee for purposes of the federal "Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938", as amended, based on payments, fees, or benefits that the firefighter receives. "Volunteer firefighter" may include other designations or titles given to firefighters provided that the firefighter meets all of the requirements for being a volunteer firefighter in this part 11.

For the purposes of this subsection (9), "compensation" does not include:

Actual expenses incurred by and reimbursed to a volunteer firefighter;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2010, (SB 10-021), ch. 17, p. 79, § 1, effective August 11, 2010.)

Participation in or receipt of benefits from the fund;

Participation in or receipt of benefits upon termination of volunteer services to any district or municipality provided as part of an internal revenue code qualified volunteer service award plan established for the benefit of volunteer firefighters;

Payments from federal moneys, either through the district or municipality or to the volunteer firefighter directly, for participation in a temporary emergency incident;

Nominal fees or benefits paid on a per-call basis or as part of an annual merit or recognition award program or other incentive award program.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1364, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 96:

(3) amended, p. 941, § 5, effective May 23.

L. 2006:

(7.5) added, p. 1422, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2007:

(2), (4), and (9) amended, p. 315, § 1, effective April 2.

L. 2010:

(9) amended, (SB 10-021), ch. 17, p. 79, § 1, effective August 11.

Cross references:

(1) For the internal revenue code referred to in subsection (9)(b)(IV), see the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended.

(2) For the federal "Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938", see 29 U.S.C. sec. 201 et seq.

31-30-1103. Board of trustees - fund.

In any municipality or district that maintains a regularly organized volunteer fire department, there is created a board of trustees of the volunteer firefighter pension fund. The board:

Shall manage, use, and disburse moneys in the fund according to its rules and bylaws and this part 11;

Shall supervise and control the fund;

May take all necessary steps and pursue all necessary remedies to preserve the fund.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1365, § 2, effective June 5.

31-30-1104. Board - municipality.

In a municipality, the board must consist of the following members:

The mayor for a term equal to the mayor's tenure as mayor;

The municipal treasurer or finance officer for a term equal to the treasurer's or finance officer's tenure with the municipality;

Two other persons appointed by and for terms determined by the governing body of the municipality; and

Prior to August 6, 2014, three fire department members serving the municipality who are elected by the fire department members of those fire departments for three-year terms.

Beginning at the next election to elect a board member pursuant to this paragraph (d) after August 6, 2014, three individuals elected from one or more of the following groups to the extent such groups exist at the time of election: Fire department members, retired fire department members, or retired fire department members returned to active service pursuant to section 31-30-1132. The three individuals shall be elected by the fire department members, retired fire department members, and retired fire department members returned to active service of those fire departments and shall serve for three-year terms as such terms exist on August 6, 2014. Nothing in this subparagraph (II) shall be construed to effect the term of any person serving on the board of a municipal volunteer firefighter pension board pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (d) on August 6, 2014.

The board shall elect a president and secretary from its members. The municipal treasurer or finance officer shall serve as the ex officio treasurer of the board.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1365, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 2014:

(1)(d) amended and (3) repealed, (HB 14-1111), ch. 24, p. 156, § 1, effective August 6.

31-30-1105. Board - fire protection district.

In a fire protection district, the board must consist of the following members:

The board of directors of the fire protection district for terms equal to their tenure on the fire protection district board;

The treasurer of the board of the fire protection district who shall be treasurer of the fund for a term equal to the treasurer's tenure on the fire protection district board; and

Prior to August 15, 2010, two fire department members elected by the fire department members for two-year terms; except that, at the initial election, one member shall be elected for two years and one member for one year. In all subsequent elections, these members shall be elected for two years.

On and after August 15, 2010, two individuals elected from one or more of the following groups to the extent such groups exist at the time of election: Fire department members, retired fire department members, or retired fire department members returned to active service pursuant to section 31-30-1132. All members in each group existing at the time of election shall be given the opportunity to vote for the two individuals. The two individuals shall serve for two-year terms; except that, at the initial election, one individual shall be elected for two years and one individual for one year. In all subsequent elections, these individuals shall be elected for two years.

Nothing in sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (II) shall be construed to limit the term of a board member elected pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c).

The board shall elect a president and secretary from its members.

The treasurer of the board shall obtain a bond paid from the fund in an amount determined by the board.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1365, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 2010:

(1)(c) amended, (SB 10-021), ch. 17, p. 80, § 2, effective August 11.

31-30-1106. Board - county improvement district.

In a county improvement district, the board must consist of the following members:

One county commissioner of the county in which the district is located for a term equal to the commissioner's tenure as county commissioner;

The county treasurer for a term equal to the treasurer's tenure with the county;

Three residents of the county obligated to pay real or personal property taxes who are appointed by the county commissioners for staggered terms determined by the county commissioners; and

Two fire department members for two-year terms.

The treasurer of the fund shall obtain a bond paid from the fund in an amount determined by the board.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1366, § 2, effective June 5.

31-30-1107. Board - consolidation or merger.

If a municipality or district merges or consolidates with one or more municipalities or districts, the former trustees of the various volunteer firefighter pension funds of the consolidated or merged municipalities or districts shall:

Elect seven persons from their members, not more than three of whom are fire department members, to serve as trustees of the volunteer firefighter pension fund of the consolidated or merged fund with due regard to equal representation;

Cease to hold office if they are not elected under paragraph (a) of this subsection (1).

The trustees of the consolidated or merged fund shall elect from its members a president, secretary, and treasurer. The treasurer of the consolidated or merged district's fund shall obtain a bond paid from the fund in an amount determined by the board.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1366, § 2, effective June 5.

31-30-1108. Board powers and duties.

A board created by this part 11 to control a fund:

Shall adopt necessary rules that are not inconsistent with this part 11 for the management and discharge of its duties, for its own government and procedure, and for the preservation and protection of the fund;

Shall hear and decide each application for benefits under this part 11 in accordance with section 24-4-105, C.R.S. Action on an application is final and conclusive; except that, if in the opinion of a board, justice demands reconsideration of the action, the board may reverse the action.

Shall keep and preserve a record of the action and all other matters properly before the board;

May make agreements with the fire and police pension association to administer the plan and manage the funds of the plan for investment in accordance with section 31-31-705;

May consolidate its fund with the fund of another municipality or district and shall administer the consolidated funds as a single fund if in the opinion of the board the total moneys allocated to a fund by a municipality or district are inadequate to sustain a proper fund for retirement or for the other purposes of the fund under this part 11. The boards of these single funds may consolidate the funds under conditions and terms provided in an agreement consistent with this part 11.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1367, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 2014:

(1)(d) amended, (SB 14-024), ch. 51, p. 232, § 1, effective March 20.

31-30-1109. Attorney representation.

The attorney for a municipality or district shall:

When required by the board, advise the board on all matters pertaining to the board's duties and management of the fund;

Represent and defend the board in any suit or action at law or in equity brought against the board; and

Bring all suits and actions on the board's behalf as the board requires or requests.

If a conflict between a board and a municipality or district exists, the board may obtain an attorney to represent the board in any action described in this section at the board's expense.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1367, § 2, effective June 5.

31-30-1110. Property tax - other tax revenue.

The governing body of a municipality with a population of less than one hundred thousand, the board of directors of each fire protection district, the board of county commissioners, or the board of a county improvement district may levy and set apart a tax for each year of not more than one mill on the taxable property in the municipality, county, or district. The governing body or board shall contribute the proceeds of this tax, if any, to the municipality's, county's, or district's fund. The total tax levied under this section and section 31-30.5-403 (1), if any, for a fire department that has both paid and volunteer firefighters must not exceed one mill on the taxable property in the municipality, county, or district. Any new tax or an increase in the mill levy under this section shall comply with the voter approval requirements under section 20 of article X of the state constitution.

The governing body of a municipality with a population of less than one hundred thousand, the board of directors of a fire protection district, the board of county commissioners, or the board of a county improvement district may contribute the proceeds of any other tax that the municipality, county, or district is authorized to collect to the municipality's, county's, or district's fund.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1367, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 941, § 6, effective May 23.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1422, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 316, § 2, effective April 2.

31-30-1111. Contribution to fund.

In addition to any tax revenues contributed under section 31-30-1110, the fund also consists of any:

Moneys given to the board or fund by a person for the use and purpose for which the fund is created. The board may take any money, personal property, or real estate, or interest therein by gift, grant, devise, or bequest as trustees for the use and purpose for which the fund is created;

Moneys, fees, rewards, or emoluments of any nature and description that are paid or given to the fund; and

Moneys provided by the state under section 31-30-1112.

Fund moneys are held in trust for the exclusive use and benefit of the fire department members and retired fire department members and their surviving spouses, dependent children, dependent parents, and other beneficiaries in accordance with this part 11.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1368, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 2006:

(2) amended, p. 179, § 1, effective March 31; IP(1) amended, p. 1423, § 3, effective June 1.

31-30-1112. State contributions - intent.

Repealed.

On and after July 1, 2004, the state treasurer shall transfer moneys to the department of local affairs for distribution as provided in this section to assist in funding volunteer firefighter pension plans. The department of local affairs shall distribute moneys for funding volunteer firefighter pension plans affiliated with the fire and police pension association pursuant to section 31-31-705 directly to the fire and police pension association as the administrator of the plan. The association shall credit the transferred moneys to the assets of the plan for which they are transferred.

State contributions to any municipality or district must equal ninety percent of all amounts contributed by the municipality or district under section

31-30-1110

in the previous year, but, notwithstanding any other provision of this part 11, the state contribution shall not exceed one-half mill on the previous net valuation for assessment of the municipality or district assuming one hundred percent collection.

A municipality or district that was contributing an amount necessary to pay volunteer firefighter pensions in excess of three hundred dollars per month shall receive state contributions under paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) in an amount not to exceed one-half mill on the previous net valuation for assessment of the municipality or district assuming one hundred percent collection but based upon the greater of:

The contribution that was actuarially required to pay a pension of three hundred dollars per month in the previous year, as determined by the municipality or district; or

The highest actual contribution received by the municipality or district during the calendar year 1998, 1999, 2000, or 2001, irrespective of whether the state contribution was authorized by law at the time it was made. In the event of a consolidation or merger of two or more municipalities or districts, the sum of the highest actual contribution received by each consolidating or merging municipality or district during the calendar year 1998, 1999, 2000, or 2001 shall be the state contribution of the surviving consolidated or merged entity for the purposes of this subparagraph (II).

and (c.5) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2002, p. 504, § 1, effective July 1, 2002.)

The board in any municipality or district shall not increase benefits above the following amounts unless the increase is approved by the governing body of the municipality or district and an actuarial review indicates a higher payment is actuarially sound:

For volunteer firefighter pensions, three hundred dollars per month;

For a short-term disability monthly annuity pursuant to section

31-30-1121

, one hundred fifty dollars per month;

For a retirement pension pursuant to section

31-30-1123

, two hundred dollars per month;

For survivor benefits pursuant to section

31-30-1127

, one hundred fifty dollars per month; or

For funeral benefits pursuant to section

31-30-1129

, one hundred dollars.

In no event shall a municipality or district receive less than one thousand dollars if the municipality or district contribution to its fund is equal to or greater than one-half mill on the previous net valuation for assessment of the municipality or district.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2002, p. 504, § 1, effective July 1, 2002.)

The moneys necessary to make the state's contribution under this section shall be derived from the proceeds of the tax imposed by section

10-3-209

, C.R.S., as follows:

Repealed.

As of July 1, 2004, the department of local affairs shall be responsible for disbursing the state contribution to each municipality and district. On or before October 31, 2004, and on or before October 31 of each year thereafter, the state treasurer shall transfer the amount necessary to provide contributions equal to the contributions made by the state to each municipality and district during the calendar year 1979 to the department for disbursement to the fund of each municipality or district.

Repealed.

To the extent that the state's contribution under this section exceeds contributions made by the state during the calendar year 1979, the state treasurer shall transfer the excess amounts from the proceeds of the tax imposed by section

10-3-209

, C.R.S., to the department of local affairs on or before October 31, 2004, and on or before October 31 of each year thereafter, for disbursement to the municipality or district's funds.

Moneys transferred under this subparagraph (II) shall be separate from and in addition to moneys transferred under section

31-30.5-307 (2)

and do not revert to the general fund but are available for the purposes provided in this section.

Repealed.

As of July 1, 2004, the executive director of the department of local affairs or the director's designee shall be responsible for providing the accidental death and disability insurance policy for volunteer firefighters as provided in sections

31-30-1134

and

31-31-202 (4)(d)

. In addition to any other transfers required by this section, on or before October 31, 2004, and on or before October 31 of each year thereafter, the state treasurer shall transfer from the proceeds of the tax imposed by section 10-3-209, C.R.S., to the department such moneys as may be necessary to pay for the accidental death and disability insurance policy for volunteer firefighters and the administrative costs of providing such policy.

Moneys transferred pursuant to this section shall be included for information purposes in the general appropriation bill or in supplemental appropriation bills to comply with the limitation on state fiscal year spending imposed by section 20 of article X of the state constitution and section

24-77-103

, C.R.S.

It is the intent of the general assembly to continually fund volunteer firefighter pension plans.

The department of local affairs shall work with the municipalities and the districts to develop a procedure by which municipalities and districts apply to receive state assistance moneys distributed pursuant to this section. The application procedure must ensure that the department can verify the amount of money to which each municipality and district is entitled before the department transfers funds to the municipalities and districts each year.

The department of local affairs shall work with the joint budget committee to develop a procedure that allows any municipality or district to apply for a late disbursement of moneys in the event that such municipality or district made a good faith effort, but was unable to comply with the application procedure created pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) due to a delay in preparing a financial statement or completing a required audit or actuarial study.

The department of local affairs may impose a nonrefundable application fee in an amount to be determined by the department on any municipality or district that applies to the department for state assistance moneys distributed pursuant to this section. The application fee may be on a sliding scale based on the amount of state assistance moneys distributed to each fund pursuant to this section in the previous year.

All revenue collected by the department of local affairs from the fee imposed pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) shall be transmitted to the state treasurer who shall credit the revenue to the volunteer fire department application fund, which fund is hereby created in the state treasury. The moneys in the fund shall be continuously appropriated to the department for the purpose of covering the direct costs of administering the distribution of the state contribution moneys pursuant to this section.

The department of local affairs shall have the authority to contract with any entity for the purpose of complying with the requirements of this section.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1368, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 96:

(2)(f), (2)(g)(II), and (2)(h) amended, p. 942, § 7, effective May 23.

L. 2002:

(2)(a), (2)(b), (2)(c), (2)(c.5), (2)(d), (2)(e), and (2)(f) amended, p. 504, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1), (2)(a), (2)(b)(I), (2)(g), and (2)(h) amended and (3) to (6) added, p. 1133, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(6)(a) amended, p. 775, § 61, effective June 1.

L. 2006:

(2)(a), (2)(b), and (2)(e) amended, p. 1423, § 4, effective June 1.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (SB 14-024), ch. 51, p. 232, § 2, effective March 20; (3)(a) and (4)(a) amended and (6) repealed, (HB 14-1169), ch. 84, p. 327, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(1)(a), (2)(g)(I)(A), (2)(g)(II)(A), and (2)(h)(I) repealed, (SB 15-264), ch. 259, p. 963, § 81, effective August 5.

31-30-1113. Fund investments.

The board may invest all or any part of fund moneys in the name of the board's treasurer or in the name of a custodian or custodians appointed by the board under this section in interest-bearing obligations of the United States, in interest-bearing bonds of this state, in general obligation bonds of municipalities, whether organized under general law or article XX of the state constitution, or in any depository stated in section 24-75-603, C.R.S., and secured as provided in articles 10.5 and 47 of title 11, C.R.S. By written resolution, the board may appoint one or more persons to act as a custodian or custodians, in addition to the treasurer, to deposit or cause to be deposited all or part of the fund in any state or national bank or any state or federally chartered savings and loan association in this state. The appointed persons shall give surety bonds, and the board shall determine the bonds' amounts, form, and purposes. These securities and evidences of investment shall be deposited with the treasurer of the municipality or district.

Upon the board's direction, the treasurer of a municipality or district may invest part of the fund available for investment, with or without one or more other volunteer firefighter pension funds, in a noninsured trust pension plan with a bank or trust company authorized to exercise trust powers in this state as a trustee. The trustee's investment of fund moneys is governed by article 1.1 of title 15, C.R.S.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the board may invest all or any part of fund moneys in the name of the board's treasurer or in the name of a custodian or custodians appointed by the board under this section in one or more of the following:

Any public-private initiative with the department of transportation, as defined in section 43-1-1201 (3), C.R.S.;

Bonds issued for turnpikes in accordance with part 2 of article 3 of title 43, C.R.S.; or

Repealed.

Any other public-private initiative program for transportation system projects in Colorado authorized by law.

The board may give preference to the investments described in subsection (3) of this section if such investments are consistent with sound investment policy.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1370, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 98:

(3) and (4) added, p. 445, § 6, effective August 5.

L. 2000:

(2) amended, p. 256, § 1, effective March 30.

L. 2005:

(3)(c) repealed, p. 289, § 39, effective August 8.

L. 2010:

(2) amended, (SB 10-021), ch. 17, p. 80, § 3, effective August 11.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1998 act adding subsections (3) and (4), see section 1 of chapter 154, Session Laws of Colorado 1998.

31-30-1114. Fund investment in insurance.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section and with the concurrence of sixty-five percent of the fire department members voting thereon and sixty-five percent of the retired fire department members voting thereon, the board may:

Insure the fire department members under the following insurance policies issued by companies authorized to do business in this state:

Individual, group, or blanket life, endowment, or annuity insurance;

Variable annuity insurance; or

Disability or liability insurance; and

Spend any part of the fund to pay premiums on these policies.

The board shall not spend fund moneys to purchase insurance if the expenditure would impair the pension fund's ability to:

Pay annuities to a fire department member, surviving spouse, or dependent parent or child receiving annuities; or

Meet the future requirements of pensions, benefits, and awards under the plan.

The board must be the beneficiary of any insurance policies, and the proceeds of the insurance policies shall be paid to the board as an addition to the fund.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1371, § 2, effective June 5.

31-30-1115. Warrants.

Officers of the municipality or district who are designated by law to draw warrants on the treasurer of the municipality or district shall draw warrants thereon upon orders by the board, payable to the board's treasurer for moneys belonging to the fund.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the board's treasurer shall pay moneys ordered to be paid from the fund to any person only upon warrants signed by the board's president and countersigned by the board's secretary. A warrant shall not be drawn except by the board's order that is duly entered in the records of the board's proceedings.

Fund moneys in noninsured trust pension plans with a bank or trust company shall be paid by the trustee only upon the board's written order that is signed by the board's president, countersigned by the board's secretary, and duly entered in the records of the board's proceedings.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1372, § 2, effective June 5.

31-30-1116. Treasurer - custodian - segregation of moneys.

The board's treasurer and the custodian appointed by the board under section 31-30-1113 are the custodians of the fund and shall secure and safely keep books and accounts concerning the fund in the manner as the board may prescribe. The books and accounts are subject to inspection by the board, any board member, or any other interested person. Upon expiration of the treasurer's or custodian's term of office or appointment, the treasurer or custodian shall surrender and deliver to the successor all bonds, securities, and unexpended moneys or other property of the fund that the treasurer or custodian has possessed.

A municipality or district that includes both paid and volunteer firefighters in their pension plans may consolidate the funds but must segregate the moneys for paid and volunteer firefighters on an equitable basis for accounting and actuarial purposes. The segregation shall be considered in actuarial reports on the funds. In computing the portion of the fund attributed to volunteer firefighters, volunteer firefighters' benefits shall not be changed.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1372, § 2, effective June 5.

31-30-1117. Exemption from levy.

Except for an assignment for child support purposes as provided in sections 14-10-118 (1) and 14-14-107, as they existed prior to July 1, 1996, and except for income assignments for child support purposes pursuant to section 14-14-111.5, C.R.S., and a writ of garnishment that is the result of a judgment taken for arrearages for child support or for child support debt, no part of the fund, either before or after any order for distribution of the fund to a fire department member, retired fire department member, or beneficiary of the fund or the surviving spouse or guardian of any child of a deceased or disabled fire department member or of a deceased, disabled, or retired fire department member shall be held, seized, taken, subjected to, detained, or levied on by virtue of any attachment, execution, protest, or proceeding of any nature whatsoever issued out of or by any court in this or any other state for the payment or satisfaction of all or part of any debt, damages, claim, demand, judgment, fine, or amercement of the municipality or district or of a fire department member, retired fire department member, or their surviving spouses, dependent children, or designated beneficiaries.

Except as provided in section 31-30-1118, the fund must be kept, secured, and distributed for the purpose of issuing pensions and protecting the persons named in this part 11 and for no other purpose whatsoever; except that the board may annually spend moneys as it deems proper and necessary from the fund for necessary expenses connected with the fund.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1372, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 626, § 44, effective July 1.

31-30-1118. Fund use - other purposes.

If the governing body of a municipality or district finds by resolution that no person is eligible or can become eligible for payment of a fund benefit, it may authorize contributions of all fund moneys for any fire-related purpose and, if no fire-related purpose exists, for any purpose as determined by the governing body of the municipality or district.

At least sixty days before adoption of this resolution, the governing body of the municipality or district shall publish one notice in a newspaper with general circulation within the municipality or district and shall provide a copy of the published notice to the board of directors of the fire and police pension association. The notice must state that the intent of the governing body is to use the money in the fund for the purposes permitted in subsection (1) of this section and that persons who believe they are or may be entitled to benefit payments from the fund have fifty days from the date of the notice in which to file a written objection with the governing body regarding its proposed use of the fund. If a written objection is received, the governing body shall hold a public hearing before adoption of the resolution. Before the hearing, the governing body shall publish notice of the time and place of the hearing and send written notice of the hearing by certified mail to each person who files a written objection.

If a person establishes a claim to a benefit from the fund within one year after adoption of this resolution, the municipality or district shall repay to the fund any money paid from the fund under this section, and no such additional payments shall be made from the fund.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1373, § 2, effective June 5.

31-30-1119. Board report - municipality.

The board shall make a report to the governing body of the municipality on the condition of the fund. The board shall submit the report to the governing body before the last meeting in February and the last meeting in August of each year.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1373, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (SB 10-021), ch. 17, p. 80, § 4, effective August 11.

31-30-1120. Maximum benefit amount. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added p. 1374, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 64, § 1, effective March 23; entire section repealed, p. 807, § 1, effective May 26.

31-30-1121. Disability pension - rules - hearing.

If a volunteer firefighter is injured while in the line of duty as a volunteer firefighter, the board shall pay to the volunteer firefighter:

A short-term disability monthly annuity for not more than one year in an amount it determines is proper and equitable, considering the financial condition of the fund, but not more than one-half the amount paid by the board pursuant to section 31-30-1122 (1) or two hundred twenty-five dollars, whichever is greater; or

A long-term disability monthly annuity for a disability that deprives the volunteer firefighter of an earning capacity and that extends beyond one year in an amount it determines is proper and necessary but not more than the amount paid by the board pursuant to section 31-30-1122 (1) or four hundred fifty dollars, whichever is greater. Any increase in the benefits in a municipality under this paragraph (b) shall be approved by the municipality's governing body.

Disability-pension applicants shall be examined by one or more physicians selected by the board and may be examined by one or more physicians selected by the applicant. The board shall pay from the fund the expenses of the physician chosen by the board.

The board shall adopt rules it deems proper concerning the examination of persons who are receiving disability benefits under this section to determine periodically the fitness of these persons. A person who is receiving benefits under this section and who is either fifty years of age or has completed twenty years of active duty in the fire department before the date disability benefits under this section are first provided shall not be reexamined. A person receiving benefits under this section shall not be examined before one year after the date disability benefits under this section are first provided and not more often than annually after this date.

The board shall terminate the disability benefits under this section of a person who the board finds has recovered sufficiently from the disability that resulted in the receipt of these benefits, is under the age of fifty years, and has served less than twenty years of active duty. A person whose benefits are terminated under this subsection (4) may file a written protest within thirty days after the termination date stating the objection to the termination and requesting a hearing. The decision of the board is suspended pending a hearing on the protest. At the hearing, the member may appear and be represented by counsel.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1374, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 807, § 2, effective May 26.